Georgia, session 2025_26, HB668.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
10 SECTION 1.
11 Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to crimes and offenses, is
12 amended in Chapter 11, relating to offenses against public order and safety, by revising Code
13 Section 16-11-107.1, relating to harassment of assistance dog by humans or other dogs and
14 penalty, as follows:
15 "16-11-107.1.
16 (a) As used in this Code section, the term:
H. B. 668 (SUB)
- 1 -

25 LC 46 2001S
17 (1) 'Assistance dog' means a dog that is or has been trained by a licensed or certified
18 person, organization, or agency to perform physical tasks for a physically challenged
19 person. Assistance dogs include guide or leader dogs that guide individuals who are
20 legally blind; hearing dogs that alert individuals who are deaf or hard of hearing to
21 specific sounds; and service dogs for individuals with disabilities other than blindness or
22 deafness, which are trained to perform a variety of physical tasks, including, but not
23 limited to, pulling a wheelchair, lending balance support, picking up dropped objects, or
24 providing assistance in a medical crisis.
25 (2) 'Harass' means to engage in any conduct directed toward an assistance a service dog
26 that is knowingly likely to impede or interfere with the assistance service dog's
27 performance of its duties or that places the blind, deaf, or physically limited physically
28 or mentally impaired person being served or assisted by the service dog in danger of
29 injury.
30 (3)(2) 'Notice' means an oral or otherwise communicated warning proscribing the
31 behavior of another person and a request that the person stop the particular behavior.
32 (3) 'Service dog' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 30-4-1.
33 (b) Any person who knowingly and intentionally with criminal negligence harasses or
34 attempts to harass an assistance a service dog, knowing when he or she knows or should
35 know the dog to be an assistance a service dog, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon
36 conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment confinement for not less than 90
37 days or a fine not to exceed $500.00, or both.
38 (c) Any person who has received notice that his or her behavior is interfering with the use
39 of an assistance a service dog and who continues to knowingly and intentionally harass an
40 assistance the service dog, knowing the dog to be an assistance dog, shall be guilty of a
41 misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment
42 confinement for not less than 90 days or a fine not to exceed $500.00, or both, provided
H. B. 668 (SUB)
- 2 -

25 LC 46 2001S
43 that any person who is convicted of a second or subsequent violation of this subsection
44 shall be punished as for a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature.
45 (d) Any person who knowingly and intentionally with criminal negligence allows his or
46 her dog to harass an assistance a service dog, knowing when he or she knows or should
47 know the dog to be an assistance a service dog, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon
48 conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment confinement for not less than 90
49 days or a fine not to exceed $500.00, or both, provided that any person who is convicted
50 of a second or subsequent violation of this subsection shall be punished as for a
51 misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature.
52 (e) Any person who knowingly and intentionally with criminal negligence allows his or
53 her dog to cause death or physical harm to an assistance a service dog by rendering a part
54 of the assistance service dog's body useless or by seriously disfiguring the assistance
55 service dog, knowing when he or she knows or should know the dog to be an assistance a
56 service dog, shall be punished as for a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature.
57 (f) Any person who causes death or physical harm to a service dog by rendering a part of
58 the service dog's body useless or by seriously disfiguring the service dog, when he or she
59 knows or should know the dog to be a service dog, shall be guilty of a felony and, upon
60 conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one nor more than
61 five years and by a fine of not more than $10,000.00. This subsection shall not apply to
62 the euthanasia of a service dog for humane purposes in a manner consistent with the
63 provisions of Code Section 4-11-5.1.
64 (g) The provisions of subsections (e) and (f) of this Code section shall not apply in
65 instances where the service dog is the aggressor toward a person or a person's dog or other
66 animal. In such instances, the person shall have the right to defend his or her person or
67 property in a manner consistent with Code Section 4-8-5."
H. B. 668 (SUB)
- 3 -

25 LC 46 2001S
68 SECTION 2.
69 Said title is further amended in Chapter 12, relating to offenses against public health and
70 morals, by revising paragraph (6) of subsection (a) of Code Section 16-12-120, relating to
71 certain acts in public transit buses, rapid rail cars, or stations and penalty, as follows:
72 "(6) Carries or possesses any explosives, acids, other dangerous articles, or live animals,
73 except for the following:
74 (A) A guide dog or service dog as described in Code Section 30-4-2, provided that
75 such guide dog or service dog is accompanied by a physically disabled person, blind
76 person, person with visual disabilities, deaf physically or mentally impaired person, or
77 a person who is responsible for training a guide dog or service dog; and
78 (B) Small pets confined to rigid pet carriers with locks or latches;"
79 SECTION 3.
80 Chapter 4 of Title 30 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to rights of persons
81 with disabilities, is amended by revising Code Section 30-4-1, relating to definitions, as
82 follows:
83 "30-4-1.
84 As used in this chapter, the term:
85 (1) 'Activities of daily living' means tasks that are essential, routine, and provide for an
86 individual's basic physical needs, including but not limited to eating, toileting, grooming,
87 dressing, shaving, walking, and transferring.
88 (2) 'Housing accommodations' means any real property or portion thereof which is used
89 or occupied, or intended, arranged, or designed to be used or occupied, as the home,
90 residence, or sleeping place of one or more human beings but shall not include any
91 single-family residence the occupants of which rent, lease, or furnish for compensation
92 not more than one room therein.
H. B. 668 (SUB)
- 4 -

25 LC 46 2001S
93 (2) 'Physically disabled person' means any person, regardless of age, who is subject to
94 a physiological defect or deficiency regardless of its cause, nature, or extent that renders
95 the person unable to move about without the aid of crutches, a wheelchair, or any other
96 form of support, or that limits the person's functional ability to ambulate, climb, descend,
97 sit, rise, or to perform any related function.
98 (3) 'Owner training' means training of a dog to become a service dog by an owner who
99 is a physically or mentally impaired person by teaching the dog to perform the specific
100 tasks that directly assist such owner and directly relate to such owner's specific disability
101 and to take a specific action when needed to assist the person.
102 (4) 'Physically or mentally impaired person' means any person, regardless of age, who,
103 regardless of the cause, nature, or extent, is rendered substantially limited or unable to
104 perform one or more activities of daily living as a result of developmental deficiencies,
105 the aging process, learning disabilities, physical injury or disease, cognitive impairments,
106 or psychological or social disabilities.
107 (5) 'Service dog' means any domestic canine that has been individually trained to do
108 work or perform tasks that directly assist a physically or mentally impaired person and
109 directly relate to such person's specific disability and to take a specific action when
110 needed to assist the person, or if still in training, that is operating under the guidance of
111 a trainer. Such term shall not include a dog that has not been trained to do a specific job
112 or task or that solely provides comfort, companionship, or emotional support to a person,
113 regardless of such person's disability status.
114 (6) 'Trainer' means a service dog owner with a disability who is involved in the training
115 process of his or her service dog or an individual who is competent to train service
116 animals and is involved in such processes."
H. B. 668 (SUB)
- 5 -

25 LC 46 2001S
117 SECTION 4.
118 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 30-4-2, relating to right to equal
119 public accommodations and right to be accompanied by guide dog or service dog, as follows:
120 "30-4-2.
121 (a) Physically or mentally impaired Blind persons, persons with visual disabilities, persons
122 with physical disabilities, and deaf persons are entitled to full and equal accommodations,
123 advantages, facilities, and privileges on all common carriers, airplanes, motor vehicles,
124 railroad trains, motor buses, streetcars, boats, or any other public conveyances or modes
125 of transportation and at hotels, lodging places, places of public accommodation,
126 amusement, or resort, and other places to which the general public is invited, subject only
127 to the conditions and limitations established by law and applicable alike to all persons.
128 (b)(1) Every totally or partially blind person shall have the right to be accompanied by
129 a guide dog, and every physically disabled person and every deaf physically or mentally
130 impaired person shall have the right to be accompanied by a service dog, especially
131 trained for the purpose, in any of the places listed in subsection (a) of this Code section
132 without being required to pay an extra charge for the guide or service dog; provided,
133 however, that he or she shall be liable for any damage done to the premises or facilities
134 by such service dog. In addition, if such totally or partially blind person, physically
135 disabled person, or deaf physically or mentally impaired person is a student at a private
136 or public school in this state, such person shall have the right to be accompanied by a
137 guide dog or service dog subject to liability for damage as provided in the preceding
138 sentence. The guide dog or service dog must be identified as having been trained by a
139 school for seeing eye, hearing, service, or guide dogs.
140 (2) Every person engaged in the training of a guide dog or service dog for the purpose
141 of accompanying a person as provided in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall have the
142 same right to be accompanied by such service dog being trained as the totally or partially
143 blind person, deaf person, or physically disabled physically or mentally impaired person
H. B. 668 (SUB)
- 6 -

25 LC 46 2001S
144 has under paragraph (1) of this subsection, so long as such trainer is engaged in owner
145 training or is identified as an agent or employee of a school for seeing eye, hearing,
146 service, or guide service dogs.
147 (3) Every person engaged in the raising of a dog for training as a guide dog or service
148 dog for the purpose of accompanying a person as provided in paragraph (1) of this
149 subsection and every physically or mentally impaired person who is engaged in owner
150 training of his or her dog as a service dog shall have the same right to be accompanied
151 by such dog being raised for training or in owner training as the totally or partially blind
152 person, deaf person, or physically disabled physically or mentally impaired person has
153 under paragraph (1) of this subsection, so long as:
154 (A) The trainer notifies an onsite manager that a service animal in training is being
155 brought onto the premises;
156 (B) Each trainer or puppy raiser during the training of a service animal is liable for any
157 damage done to persons, premises, or facilities by that service animal in training;
158 (C) Such dog is being held on a leash and is under the control of the person raising
159 such dog for an accredited school for seeing eye, hearing, service, or guide dogs at all
160 times and such control includes that such dog is on a harness, leash, or other tether,
161 unless either the handler is unable because of a disability to use a harness, leash, or
162 other tether, or the use of a harness, leash, or other tether would interfere with the
163 service dog's safe, effective performance of work or tasks, in which case the service dog
164 must be otherwise under the handler's control through the use of voice control, signals,
165 or other effective means;
166 (B) Such person has on his or her person and available for inspection credentials from
167 the accredited school for which the dog is being raised; and
168 (D) Such dog is at least six months of age and is reliably housebroken; and
H. B. 668 (SUB)
- 7 -

25 LC 46 2001S
169 (C)(E) Such dog is wearing a collar, leash, or other appropriate apparel or device that
170 identifies such dog with the accredited school for which such dog is being raised as
171 being trained as a service dog.
172 (c) If a person engaged in the raising and training of a service dog does not uphold the
173 requirements of paragraph (3) of subsection (b), then business and public entities shall have
174 the right to ask the person to remove the service dog in training. In such instance, the staff
175 of the business or public entity shall offer the person with the disability the opportunity to
176 obtain goods or services without the animal's presence.
177 (d) Service dogs in training shall have the same rights and protections under the law as
178 working service dogs.
179 (e) Every totally or partially blind person operating a vending stand shall have the right to
180 be accompanied by a trained guide service dog on the entire premises of his or her vending
181 operation."
182 SECTION 5.
183 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 30-4-3, relating to right to housing
184 accommodations, as follows:
185 "30-4-3.
186 (a) Physically or mentally impaired Blind persons, visually disabled persons, physically
187 disabled persons, and deaf persons shall be entitled to rent, lease, or purchase, as other
188 members of the general public, all housing accommodations offered for rent, lease, or other
189 compensation in this state, subject to the conditions and limitations established by law and
190 applicable alike to all persons.
191 (b) Every totally or partially blind person, every physically disabled person, and every deaf
192 physically or mentally impaired person who has a guide dog or service dog or who obtains
193 a guide dog or service dog and every person engaged in the training of a guide dog or
194 service dog shall be entitled to full and equal access to all housing accommodations
H. B. 668 (SUB)
- 8 -

25 LC 46 2001S
195 provided for in this Code section, and he or she shall not be required to pay extra
196 compensation for such guide dog or service dog. However, he or she shall be liable for any
197 damage done to the premises by such guide dog or service dog.
198 (c) Nothing in this Code section shall require any person renting, leasing, or otherwise
199 providing real property for compensation to modify his or her property in any way or
200 provide a higher degree of care for a blind, visually disabled, physically disabled, or deaf
201 physically or mentally impaired person than for a person who is not so disabled physically
202 or mentally impaired."
203 SECTION 6.
204 Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 30-4-4, relating to denial of or
205 interference with admittance to or enjoyment of facilities or exercise of rights, as follows:
206 "30-4-4.
207 (a) Any person, firm, or corporation, or the agent of any person, firm, or corporation, who
208 denies or interferes with admittance to or enjoyment of the facilities enumerated in this
209 chapter or otherwise interferes with the rights of a totally or partially blind person,
210 physically disabled person, or deaf physically or mentally impaired person or person
211 engaged in the training or raising of a guide dog or service dog as provided by this chapter
212 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and, upon conviction
213 thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed $2,000.00, imprisonment confinement
214 for not more than 30 days, or both.
215 (b) Any individual who deliberately misrepresents himself or herself as qualified to use
216 a service dog or train or raise service dogs for the purpose of obtaining accommodations
217 or securing rights under this chapter shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and
218 aggravated nature and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine not to exceed
219 $2,000.00, confinement for not more than 30 days, or both."
H. B. 668 (SUB)
- 9 -

25 LC 46 2001S
220 SECTION 7.
221 Chapter 6 of Title 40 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to uniform rules
222 of the road, is amended by revising Code Section 40-6-94, relating to right of way of blind
223 pedestrian, as follows:
224 "40-6-94.
225 The driver of every vehicle shall yield the right of way to any blind pedestrian who is
226 carrying a walking cane or stick white in color or white tipped with red or who is
227 accompanied by a guide dog service dog."
228 SECTION 8.
229 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 668 (SUB)
- 10 -